Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1259
Costs, fees, and expenses.

(a) The court shall award the prevailing party, including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the party, including costs, communication expenses, attorney's fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care, during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees or expenses are sought establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.

(b) The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other than the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 34.